Utah statutes.
31A-22-602.   Premium rates.

(1)  This section does not apply to group accident and health insurance.

(2)  The benefits in an accident and health insurance policy shall be reasonable in relation to the premiums charged.

(3)  The commissioner shall prohibit the use of an accident and health insurance policy form or rates if the form or rates do not satisfy Subsection (2).

